Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2710.03
Rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effect the purposes of sections 69-2703 to 69-2711.

Laws 2011, LB590, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 20.